Utah statutes.
58-37b-3.   Considerations in determining whether substance is imitation
controlled substance.
If the appearance of the dosage unit is not reasonably sufficient to establish
that the substance is an imitation controlled substance, as in liquids or
powders, the following factors should be considered:
(1)  statements made by an owner or by anyone else in control of the
substance, concerning the nature of the substance, its use or effect, or its
similarity to a controlled substance;
(2)  statements made to the recipient that the substance may be resold at a
price substantially higher than the usual and customary price for the
ingredients contained in the substance;
(3)  whether the substance is packaged or labeled in a manner similar to that
generally used for controlled substances;
(4)  evasive tactics or actions utilized by the owner or person in control of
the substance to avoid detection by law enforcement authorities;
(5)  prior convictions of an owner or anyone in control of the object, under
state or federal law related to controlled substances or fraud; and
(6)  the proximity of the substances to controlled substances.
